Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201466-909.04
Wind agreement, defined.

Wind agreement means a right,
whether or not stated in the form of a restriction, easement, covenant, or
condition, in any deed, wind easement, wind option, lease, or lease option
securing land for the study or production of wind-generated energy or any
other instrument executed by or on behalf of any owner of land or air space
for the purpose of allowing another party to study the potential for or to
develop a wind energy conversion system on such land or in such air space.

Laws 2012, LB828, § 4.